Utah statutes.
78A-2-221.   Justices and judges -- Limitations during terms.

A justice or judge of any court of record may not, during his term of office:

(1)  practice law or have a partner engaged in the practice of law;

(2)  hold office in or make any contribution to any political party or organization engaged in political activity; or

(3)  use, in his efforts to obtain or retain judicial office, any political party designation, reference, or description.

